District of Columbia statutes.
47-2853.131

Scope of practice for engineers.

For the purposes of this part, the term “practice of engineering” means the application of special knowledge of the mathematical, physical and engineering sciences and the methods of engineering analysis and design in the performance of services and creative work including consultation, investigation, expert technical testimony, evaluation, planning, design and design coordination of engineering works and systems, planning the use of land and water, performing engineering surveys and studies, and the review of construction for the purpose of monitoring compliance with drawings and specifications, in connection with any utilities, structures, buildings, machines, equipment, processes, work systems, projects, and industrial or consumer products, or equipment of a control systems, communications, mechanical, electrical, hydraulic, pneumatic, or thermal nature, that may involve safeguarding life, health, or property, and including such other professional services as may be necessary to the planning, progress, and completion of any engineering services.

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1002, 46 DCR 3142

History

This section is referenced in § 47-2853.61.

Section References

1981 Ed., § 47-2853.131.

Prior Codifications